Illinois, session 104th, HB2154.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Speech Rights of Student Journalists Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 80/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Speech Rights of Student Journalists Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-678, eff. 7-29-16.)